District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1102.06

Reports of receipts and expenditures by political committees and candidates.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 452, Pub. L. 93-376, title II, § 206
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 3, 25 DCR 257
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 3, 25 DCR 257
June 7, 1979, D.C. Law 3-1, § 3(c), 25 DCR 9454
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(c), (q)-(s), 29 DCR 458
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862
1981 Ed., § 1-1416.
1973 Ed., § 1-1136.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-33, in subsec. (a), substituted “in the 7 months preceding the date on which, and in each year during which, an election is held for the office” for “in each year during which there is held an election for the office”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-33 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Campaign Finance Reporting Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-95, July 11, 2011, 58 DCR 5818).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Campaign Finance Reporting Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-197, October 18, 2011, 58 DCR 9167).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).